Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2574.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1600, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1600. Appeal A. A party may appeal the judgment of the court. The appeal may be to the superior court in the same manner as provided by rules adopted by the supreme court. If the appeal is granted, the court shall report the stay of enforcement of the judgment to the department. on receipt of the report, the department may not pursue any administrative action related to the judgment issued by the court until the stay is lifted or the judgment is affirmed by an appellate court. B. The posting of an appeal bond stays enforcement of the judgment. C. Commissioners of the superior court may hear and determine appeals. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.